Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-462.02
Legislative intent; director; department;
powers and duties.

It is the intent of the Legislature that
the department develop, implement, and maintain processes for the issuance
of operators' licenses and state identification cards designed to protect
the identity of applicants for and holders of such licenses and cards and
reduce identity theft, fraud, forgery, and counterfeiting to the maximum extent
possible with respect to such licenses and cards. The
department shall adopt security and technology practices to enhance the enrollment,
production, data storage, and credentialing system of such licenses and cards
in order to maximize the integrity of the process.

Laws 2008, LB911, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 2.